Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-308 Absence of specified place
for delivery. Unless otherwise agreed:

(a) The place for delivery of goods is the seller's
place of business or if he has none his residence; but

(b) In a contract for sale of identified goods which
to the knowledge of the parties at the time of contracting are in some other
place, that place is the place for their delivery; and

(c) Documents of title may be delivered through
customary banking channels. [L 1965, c 208, §2-308; HRS §490:2-308]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next